Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1,110.03
Medical parole; revocation; effect.

(1) If during the term of medical parole the medical condition of a medical parolee improves to the extent that he or she is no longer eligible for medical parole, the board may order that he or she be returned to the custody of the department to await a hearing to determine whether the medical parole should be revoked.

(2) If medical parole is revoked due to improvement in the medical condition of the parolee, he or she shall serve the balance of his or her sentence with credit for time served on medical parole and without forfeiture of any credits accrued for good conduct pursuant to the Nebraska Treatment and Corrections Act prior to medical parole.

(3) If a medical parolee whose medical parole is revoked due to improvement in his or her medical condition would otherwise be eligible for parole or any other release program, he or she may be considered for such release program.

(4) In addition to revocation of medical parole pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, medical parole may also be revoked for violation of any condition of the medical parole established by the board.

Laws 2005, LB 538, § 26.